District of Columbia statutes.
20-106

Preference.

Except as provided in sections 20-343 and 20-703 , there shall be no preference or priority between real and personal property.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(f), 42 DCR 63

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-106.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-108.01.